Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Note

Part I designation added by L 2001, c 281, §2.

§481B-1 Unsolicited goods, etc.,
unconditional gift. No person, firm, partnership, association, or
corporation, or agent or employee thereof, shall, in any manner, or by any
means, offer for sale goods, property, or merchandise, where the offer includes
the voluntary and unsolicited sending of goods, property, or merchandise not
actually ordered or requested by the recipient, either orally or in writing.
The receipt of any such unsolicited goods, property, or merchandise shall for
all purposes be deemed an unconditional gift to the recipient who may use or
dispose of the same in any manner the recipient sees fit without any obligation
on the recipient's part to the sender. [L 1969, c 84, §1; gen ch 1985; am L
1996, c 59, §3]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next